Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.08
Hazardous waste; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-1521.08 to 81-1521.23, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Chief executive officer shall mean the mayor, city manager, or chairperson of the board of trustees of a municipality;

(2) Commercial hazardous waste management facility shall mean a hazardous waste management facility which accepts hazardous waste for treatment, storage, or disposal which is generated by any person other than the person which owns or operates such facility;

(3) Committee shall mean the specific site review committee established in response to a notice of intent filed pursuant to section 81-1521.09;

(4) Hazardous waste management facility shall mean all contiguous land, and structures, other appurtenances, and improvements on the land, used for the treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste. A hazardous waste management facility may consist of several treatment, storage, or disposal operational units such as one or more landfills or surface impoundments or any combination of such operational units;

(5) Municipality shall mean an incorporated city or village; and

(6) Other definitions found in section 81-1502 shall apply.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 2.